Illinois, session 104th, HB4161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Labor Law of 2024 is amended by 5changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 206/20)7    Sec. 20. Exemptions. 8    (a) Nothing in this Act applies to the work of a minor 9engaged in agricultural pursuits, except that no minor under 1012 years of age, except members of the farmer's own family who 11live with the farmer at his principal place of residence, at 12any time shall be employed, allowed, or permitted to work in 13any gainful occupation in connection with agriculture, except 14that any minor of 10 years of age or older shall be permitted 15to work in a gainful occupation in connection with agriculture 16during school vacations or outside of school hours.17    (b) Nothing in this Act applies to the work of a minor 18engaged in the sale and distribution of magazines and 19newspapers outside of school hours. 20    (c) Nothing in this Act applies a minor's performance of 21household chores or babysitting outside of school hours if 22that work is performed in or about a private residence and not 23in connection with an established business, trade, or   HB4161- 2 -LRB104 15793 SPS 28987 b1profession of the person employing, allowing, or permitting 2the minor to perform the activities.3    (d) Nothing in this Act applies to the work of a minor 13 4years of age or older in caddying at a golf course.5    (e) Nothing in this Act applies to a minor 14 or 15 years 6of age who is, under the direction of the minor's school, 7participating in work-based learning programs in accordance 8with the School Code.9    (f) Nothing in this Act prohibits an employer from 10employing, allowing, or permitting a minor 12 or 13 years of 11age to work as an officiant or an assistant instructor of youth 12sports activities for a not-for-profit youth club, park 13district, township parks and recreation department, or 14municipal parks and recreation department if the employer 15obtains certification as provided for in Section 55 and:16        (1) the parent or guardian of the minor who is working 17    as an officiant or an assistant instructor, or an adult 18    designated by the parent or guardian, shall be present at 19    the youth sports activity while the minor is working;20        (2) the minor may work as an officiant or an assistant 21    instructor for a maximum of 3 hours per day on school days 22    and a maximum of 4 hours per day on non-school days;23        (3) the minor shall not exceed 10 hours of officiating 24    and working as assistant instructor in any week;25        (4) the minor shall not work later than 9:00 p.m. on 26    any day of the week; and  HB4161- 3 -LRB104 15793 SPS 28987 b1        (5) the participants in the youth sports activity are 2    at least 3 years younger than the minor unless an 3    individual 16 years of age or older is officiating or 4    instructing the same youth sports activity with the minor.5    The failure to satisfy the requirements of this subsection 6may result in the revocation of the minor's employment 7certificate.8    (g) Nothing in this Act prohibits a minor's parent or 9legal guardian from employing the minor outside of school 10hours at a business in which the minor's parent or legal 11guardian has at least 51% ownership and that employs no more 12than 50 employees.13(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25; 104-35, eff. 8-1-25.)